Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.190

Compensation for injury or death—Chapter exclusive.

Except as provided in this chapter, an emergency worker and his or her dependents shall have no right to receive compensation from the state, from the agency, from the local organization for emergency management with which he or she is registered, or from the county or city which has empowered the local organization for emergency management to register him or her and direct his or her activities, for an injury or death arising out of and occurring in the course of his or her activities as an emergency worker.

[ 2011 c 336 s 792; 1984 c 38 s 18; 1974 ex.s. c 171 s 21; 1953 c 223 s 3.]